Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB40.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. If any person elected to state or local office decides not to
be a candidate for such office at the next election or is defeated as a
candidate for such office, whether in a primary election or a general
election, then any candidate campaign account for such person for such
office shall be terminated on or before the date that is 90 days after the
date of the second subsequent general election for such office in which
such person is not elected. The treasurer for any such candidate campaign
account shall dispose of any residual funds as required under K.S.A. 25-
4157a, and amendments thereto, and file the required termination report
pursuant to K.S.A. 25-4157, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.